New York, session 2025-2026, A5300.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 755 of the correction law, as added by chapter 931 2 of the laws of 1976, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 755. Enforcement. [1. In relation to actions by public agencies, the 4 provisions of this article shall be enforceable by a proceeding brought 5 pursuant to article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules. 6 2. In relation to actions by private employers, the] The provisions of 7 this article shall be enforceable by the division of human rights pursu- 8 ant to the powers and procedures set forth in article fifteen of the 9 executive law, and, concurrently, by the New York city commission on 10 human rights; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be 11 construed to limit the right of a person to pursue any legal remedy 12 available under article fifteen of the executive law or any other appli- 13 cable provision of law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02125-01-5